pt-BR: Variedade de pepino: Armênio; Inglês; Maxixe; Japonês; Kirby; Libanês; Limão; Persa; Para conserva; Para fatiar; Outra
ro-RO: Varietate de castravete: Armenesc; Englezesc; Cornișon; Japonez; Kirby; Libanez; Lămâie; Persan; Pentru murat; Pentru feliat; Altele
nl: Komkommer soort: Armeens; Engels; Augurk; Japans; Kirby; Libanees; Citroen; Perzisch; Inmaken; Snijden; Overig
th: แตงกวาพันธุ์ต่างๆ: อาร์เมเนีย; อังกฤษ; เกอร์คิน; ญี่ปุ่น; เคอร์บี; เลบานอน; เลมอน; เปอร์เซีย; แตงกวาดอง; แตงกวาหั่นชิ้น; อื่นๆ
ru: Сорт огурца: Армянский; Английский; Корнишон; Японский; Кирби; Ливанский; Лимонный; Персидский; Засолочный; Салатный; Другое
hu: Uborkafajta: Örmény; Kígyóuborka; Csemegeuborka; Japán; Kirby; Libanoni; Citromuborka; Perzsa; Eltevőuborka; Salátauborka; Egyéb
nb: Agurkvariant: Armensk; Engelsk; Drueagurk; Japansk; Kirby; Libanesisk; Sitronagurk; Persisk; Sylteagurk; Slangeagurk; Annet
de: Gurkensorte: Armenisch; Englisch; Gewürzgurke; Japanisch; Kirby; Libanesisch; Zitronengurke; Persisch; Einlegegurke; Salatgurke; Sonstige
zh-CN: 黄瓜品种: 亚美尼亚黄瓜; 英国黄瓜; 小黄瓜; 日本黄瓜; 柯比黄瓜; 黎巴嫩黄瓜; 柠檬黄瓜; 波斯黄瓜; 腌黄瓜; 切片黄瓜; 其他
ja: キュウリの種類: アルメニア; イングリッシュ; ガーキン; ジャパニーズ; カービー; レバニーズ; レモン; ペルシャ; ピクルス用; スライス用; その他
sv: Gurkasort: Armenisk; Engelsk; Druvgurka; Japansk; Kirby; Libanesisk; Citrongurka; Persisk; Inläggningsgurka; Salladsgurka; Övrigt
bg-BG: Сорт краставица: Арменска; Английска; Корнишон; Японска; Кърби; Ливанска; Лимонова; Персийска; За туршия; За салата; Други
fi: Kurkkulajike: Armenialainen; Englantilainen; Maustekurkku; Japanilainen; Kirby; Libanonilainen; Sitruunakurkku; Persialainen; Säilöntäkurkku; Viipalekurkku; Muu
fr: Variété de concombre: Arménien; Anglais; Cornichon; Japonais; Kirby; Libanais; Citron; Persan; À mariner; À trancher; Autre
el: Ποικιλία αγγουριού: Αρμένικο; Αγγλικό; Αγγουράκι τουρσί (Gherkin); Ιαπωνικό; Kirby; Λιβανέζικο; Λεμονάτο; Περσικό; Για τουρσί; Για σαλάτα (Slicing); Άλλο
ko: 오이 품종: 아르메니안; 잉글리시; 거킨; 재패니즈; 커비; 레바니즈; 레몬; 페르시안; 피클링; 슬라이싱; 기타
hr-HR: Sorta krastavca: Armenski; Engleski; Kornišon; Japanski; Kirby; Libanonski; Limunski; Perzijski; Za kiseljenje; Za rezanje; Ostalo
en: Cucumber variety: Armenian; English; Gherkin; Japanese; Kirby; Lebanese; Lemon; Persian; Pickling; Slicing; Other
da: Agurkesort: Armensk; Engelsk; Drueagurk; Japansk; Kirby; Libanesisk; Citronagurk; Persisk; Sylteagurk; Skæreagurk; Andet
lt-LT: Agurkų rūšis: Armėniški; Angliški; Kornišonai; Japoniški; „Kirby“; Libanietiški; Citrinų formos; Persiški; Marinavimui; Salotiniai; Kita
sl-SI: Sorta kumar: Armenska; Angleška; Kornišon; Japonska; Kirby; Libanonska; Limonina; Perzijska; Za vlaganje; Za solato; Drugo
es: Variedad de pepino: Armenio; Inglés; Pepinillo; Japonés; Kirby; Libanés; Limón; Persa; Para encurtir; Para rebanar; Otro
pt-PT: Variedade de pepino: Arménio; Inglês; Gherkin; Japonês; Kirby; Libanês; Limão; Persa; Para conserva; Para fatiar; Outro
tr: Salatalık çeşidi: Ermeni; İngiliz; Kornişon; Japon; Kirby; Lübnan; Limon; Acem; Turşuluk; Dilimlik; Diğer
pl: Odmiana ogórka: Ormiański; Angielski; Korniszon; Japoński; Kirby; Libański; Cytrynowy; Perski; Do konserwowania; Sałatkowy; Inne
cs: Odrůda okurky: Arménská; Anglická; Nakládačka; Japonská; Kirby; Libanonská; Citronová; Perská; Nakládací; Salátová; Ostatní
sk-SK: Odroda uhorky: Arménska; Anglická; Nakladačka; Japonská; Kirby; Libanonská; Citrónová; Perzská; Na zaváranie; Šalátová; Iné
vi: Giống dưa chuột: Armenian; Anh; Dưa chuột non (Gherkin); Nhật Bản; Kirby; Lebanon; Lemon; Ba Tư; Dùng để muối; Dùng để thái lát; Khác
zh-TW: 小黃瓜品種: 亞美尼亞黃瓜; 英國黃瓜; 醃黃瓜; 日本黃瓜; 柯比黃瓜; 黎巴嫩黃瓜; 檸檬黃瓜; 波斯黃瓜; 醃製用黃瓜; 切片用黃瓜; 其他
it: Varietà di cetriolo: Armeno; Inglese; Cetriolino; Giapponese; Kirby; Libanese; Limone; Persiano; Da sottaceto; Da affettare; Altro